Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.140

Conveyance to purchaser, etc., presumed to be in compliance with chapter.

Any instrument executed by a municipality and purporting to convey any right, title, or interest in any property under this chapter shall be conclusively presumed to have been executed in compliance with the provisions of this chapter insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees, or transferees of such property is concerned.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.81.140. Prior: 1957 c 42 s 14.]